chrome/third_party/hunspell/dictionaries/ca_ES.dic
abancalava/AZ
abarrocava/AZ
abatés/PZ
abjurava/AZ
aboniré/MNZ
abrasiré/MNZ
abrinava/AZ
absol/CSZ
abstenies/Z
abstindran/Z
abstindré/Z
abstingueu/Z
abstinguéssim/Z
abstrec/Z
aburgesava/AZ
acampava/AZ
acaptava/AZ
acastellanava/AZ
accelerava/AZ
acidava/AZ
aclariré/MNZ
acolliré/MZ
acompanyava/AZ
acontentava/AZ
acorreguem/CZ
acorreguéreu/Z
acorrerem/Z
acorreríem/Z
acorrin/CZ
acostumava/AZ
acresqués/QZ
acugulava/AZ
acurtava/AZ
adeien/Z
adiem/CZ
adigui/DZ
adiguéssiu/Z
adirien/Z
adjudicava/AZ
adollava/AZ
adoptava/AZ
adscrigués/QZ
advenia/Z
adverbialitzava/AZ
advindrà/Z
advinguessin/Z
advinguéreu/Z
adèieu/Z
afanava/AZ
afegiré/MNZ
aferrissava/AZ
afiliava/AZ
afligiré/MNZ
aforestava/AZ
afusellava/AZ
agarbuixava/AZ
agençava/AZ
agomboiava/AZ
agrairé/MNZ
agrumava/AZ
aguerriré/MNZ
aiguabat/CSZ
aixafinava/AZ
ajauré/TZ
ajocava/AZ
alabava/AZ
alcadufava/AZ
aletejava/AZ
aljubava/AZ
alleugeriré/MNZ
allocava/AZ
alquilava/AZ
alumenava/AZ
alçapremava/AZ
amansava/AZ
amarguejava/AZ
amaçava/AZ
americanitzava/AZ
amollava/AZ
amorrallava/AZ
amotinava/AZ
amunionava/AZ
anaren/Z
anau/CZ
anem/CZ
anguilejava/AZ
aniré/TZ
anotava/AZ
anticipava/AZ
anàs/Z
aní/GVYZ
apamava/AZ
aparegués/QZ
aparracava/AZ
apegava/AZ
apercebré/TZ
apetonava/AZ
apitrava/AZ
apletava/AZ
apomava/AZ
apostatava/AZ
aprehenia/OZ
aprofitava/AZ
aproximava/AZ
aquarterava/AZ
arbitrava/AZ
argentava/AZ
armejava/AZ
arponava/AZ
arranava/AZ
arraïmava/AZ
arremangava/AZ
arrenglerava/AZ
arrimava/AZ
arronsava/AZ
arrugava/AZ
artigava/AZ
aspergiré/MNZ
assagetava/AZ
assassinava/AZ
assenyalava/AZ
asseuré/TZ
assoldava/AZ
assumiré/MNZ
atallava/AZ
atarterava/AZ
atenien/Z
atenyés/PZ
atinc/Z
atindràs/Z
atinguessis/Z
atingués/Z
atomitzava/AZ
atracallava/AZ
atraçava/AZ
atribolava/AZ
atuiré/MNZ
auscultava/AZ
avalava/AZ
avenia/Z
aveníem/Z
aviava/AZ
avindrem/Z
avindríem/Z
avingueu/Z
avinguéssim/Z
avé/Z
edificava/AZ
eguinava/AZ
eixancava/AZ
eixaugava/AZ
eixirem/Z
eixiràs/Z
eixobriré/MNZ
eixíem/Z
ejectava/AZ
elevava/AZ
embabaiava/AZ
embalatjava/AZ
embalumava/AZ
embarcava/AZ
embarrellava/AZ
embassava/AZ
embessonava/AZ
emblanquiré/MNZ
embolava/AZ
emborniava/AZ
embotava/AZ
embotxava/AZ
embretoliré/MNZ
embrossava/AZ
embutllofava/AZ
emfasitzava/AZ
emmalurava/AZ
emmantava/AZ
emmascarava/AZ
emmetxava/AZ
emmorrallava/AZ
emmustigava/AZ
empallegava/AZ
empantanegava/AZ
emparava/AZ
empassolava/AZ
empatxonava/AZ
empegueiré/MNZ
empenyorava/AZ
empescava/AZ
empiocava/AZ
emplastrava/AZ
empolainava/AZ
empomava/AZ
empostava/AZ
emprendré/TZ
emprèn/CSZ
enaltiré/MNZ
enaspriré/MNZ
encabritava/AZ
encalaixonava/AZ
encalostrava/AZ
encanastrava/AZ
encaparrotava/AZ
encapullava/AZ
encarcerava/AZ
encartava/AZ
encaterinava/AZ
encendrava/AZ
encerava/AZ
encertava/AZ
encirava/AZ
enclavillava/AZ
encobertorava/AZ
encobreixo/Z
encobrim/CZ
encobriries/Z
encobriu/CZ
encobríssiu/Z
encoleriré/MNZ
enconxava/AZ
encorreguem/CZ
encorreguéreu/Z
encorrerem/Z
encorreríem/Z
encorrin/CZ
encotonava/AZ
encrocava/AZ
encuirassava/AZ
endentava/AZ
endinsava/AZ
endomassava/AZ
enduem/Z
endugueu/Z
enduguéssim/Z
enduran/Z
endurà/Z
endúiem/Z
enfangava/AZ
enfastidiré/MNZ
enferiré/MNZ
enfilava/AZ
enfolliré/MNZ
enforatava/AZ
enfoscava/AZ
enfrontava/AZ
enfugin/CZ
enfugiries/Z
enfugissis/Z
enfugíssim/Z
enfurrunyava/AZ
engalavernava/AZ
engaltava/AZ
engargallava/AZ
engatava/AZ
enginjolava/AZ
engoliré/MNZ
engraellava/AZ
engreixinava/AZ
engrossiré/MNZ
enguerxinava/AZ
enjoiellava/AZ
enlairava/AZ
enllaunava/AZ
enlletgiré/MNZ
enllosava/AZ
ennavegava/AZ
enorgullava/AZ
enquistava/AZ
enrampava/AZ
enredava/AZ
enretirava/AZ
enriolava/AZ
enrolava/AZ
ensabava/AZ
ensalivava/AZ
enseguiré/MNZ
enseuava/AZ
ensofronyava/AZ
ensostrava/AZ
ensutzava/AZ
entallava/AZ
enteixinava/AZ
entenia/OZ
entinava/AZ
entorcillava/AZ
entotsolava/AZ
entrebancava/AZ
entrecreuava/AZ
entrediem/Z
entredigui/DZ
entrediguéssiu/Z
entredirà/Z
entredèiem/Z
entrelligassava/AZ
entrelluus/Z
entremetia/OZ
entreobren/Z
entreobriran/Z
entreobrirà/Z
entreobriu/CZ
entreobríssim/Z
entreseguiré/MNZ
entretzenava/AZ
entreveien/Z
entreveié/Z
entrevenien/Z
entreveres/Z
entreveuries/Z
entrevindran/Z
entrevindré/Z
entrevingueu/Z
entrevinguéssim/Z
entrevérem/Z
entroncava/AZ
enturava/AZ
envalentiré/MNZ
enventava/AZ
envescava/AZ
enviduava/AZ
environava/AZ
enxampava/AZ
equidistava/AZ
equivalia/OZ
erigiré/MNZ
errava/AZ
esbafegava/AZ
esbaltiré/MNZ
esbarrejava/AZ
esbatussava/AZ
esblanqueiré/MNZ
esbordellava/AZ
esbotifarrava/AZ
esbrocava/AZ
esbrotava/AZ
escabellava/AZ
escaguitxava/AZ
escaldufava/AZ
escamnava/AZ
escantellava/AZ
escapava/AZ
escardassava/AZ
escarpellava/AZ
escarrollava/AZ
escatava/AZ
escava/AZ
esclafiré/MNZ
escocellava/AZ
escollava/AZ
esconillava/AZ
escorpitava/AZ
escorreguessin/Z
escorreguéssiu/Z
escorrerien/Z
escorreu/CZ
escorríem/Z
escotxinava/AZ
escrivia/OZ
escucava/AZ
esculpiré/MNZ
esdentegava/AZ
esdevens/Z
esdevindrien/Z
esdevingueren/Z
esdevingué/Z
esfacelava/AZ
esflorava/AZ
esgaldinyava/AZ
esgarrinxava/AZ
esglevava/AZ
esgrassotava/AZ
esgrumollava/AZ
esllanguiré/MNZ
esmaltava/AZ
esmerdissava/AZ
esmolava/AZ
esmortiré/MNZ
espaiava/AZ
espaordiré/MNZ
espasava/AZ
especiava/AZ
espelleringava/AZ
espellucava/AZ
espenyia/OZ
esperrucava/AZ
espiava/AZ
espingava/AZ
espipellejava/AZ
espitregava/AZ
espodassava/AZ
esponcellava/AZ
espotonava/AZ
espuava/AZ
esqueia/OZ
esquerava/AZ
esquilava/AZ
estabilitzava/AZ
estaiava/AZ
estampiré/MNZ
estareu/Z
estaríem/Z
estaven/Z
estereotipava/AZ
esterrossava/AZ
estigueres/Z
estiguérem/Z
estimava/AZ
estireganyava/AZ
estorava/AZ
estossinava/AZ
estrafacis/Z
estrafaries/Z
estrafeies/Z
estrafà/Z
estraféssiu/Z
estrenava/AZ
estricava/AZ
estronxava/AZ
estufiré/MNZ
esvairé/MNZ
esventrellava/AZ
eteritzava/AZ
evacuava/AZ
exacerbava/AZ
excardinava/AZ
exclouré/TZ
excusava/AZ
exhalava/AZ
existimava/AZ
expectorava/AZ
expirava/AZ
expressava/AZ
exsudava/AZ
extractava/AZ
extraus/Z
extreguis/Z
hagi/DZ
haguérem/Z
halava/AZ
haureu/Z
hauríeu/Z
havíeu/Z
herboritzava/AZ
heus/Z
hipnotitzava/AZ
homogeneïtzava/AZ
hostejava/AZ
idealitzava/AZ
il·lusionava/AZ
immigrava/AZ
impartiré/MNZ
implementava/AZ
imprecava/AZ
imprimeixin/CZ
imprimien/Z
imprimiria/Z
imprimissin/Z
imprimís/Z
impulsava/AZ
incitava/AZ
incorporava/AZ
incorregué/Z
incorren/Z
incorreràs/Z
incorrien/Z
increpava/AZ
indemnitzava/AZ
indisposava/AZ
infamava/AZ
infibulava/AZ
infon/CSZ
infringiré/MNZ
iniciava/AZ
insalivava/AZ
insinuava/AZ
instava/AZ
insubordinava/AZ
interaccionava/AZ
interdiem/Z
interdigui/DZ
interdiguéssiu/Z
interdirà/Z
interdèiem/Z
interpolava/AZ
intervenen/Z
interveníeu/Z
intervindries/Z
intervingueres/Z
intervinguérem/Z
intimava/AZ
intubava/AZ
inventava/AZ
ireixeré/TZ
irritava/AZ
isolava/AZ
ixin/CZ
objurgava/AZ
obren/Z
obriran/Z
obrirà/Z
obriu/CZ
obríssim/Z
obstava/AZ
obteniu/CZ
obtindria/Z
obtinguem/CZ
obtinguis/Z
obturava/AZ
obvens/Z
obvindria/Z
obvinguem/CZ
obvinguis/Z
obvé/Z
ocorregueres/Z
ocorreguéssim/Z
ocorreria/Z
ocorres/Z
ocorro/Z
ofegava/AZ
ofereixin/CZ
oferien/Z
oferiria/Z
oferissin/Z
oferíreu/Z
oiava/AZ
ombrava/AZ
omples/Z
omplirem/Z
ompliràs/Z
omplo/Z
omplíssiu/Z
oposava/AZ
orbitava/AZ
orientava/AZ
oronejava/AZ
oscava/AZ
ovalava/AZ
serien/Z
ucava/AZ
ullprenia/OZ
unflava/AZ
universalitzava/AZ
usdefruitava/AZ
